Arkansas, session 2025, HB1482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-201(a)(2), concerning exceptions to
the requirement that each child of a certain age shall enroll in and attend a
school, is amended to read as follows:
(2) A child who has received a GED or a high school diploma or
its equivalent as determined by the State Board of Education is not subject
to the attendance requirement under this section;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-201(d), concerning requirements a
student must meet in order to take a GED test while enrolled is amended to
read as follows:
(d) Students age sixteen (16) or above enrolled in a public, private,
parochial, or home school who desire to take the GED test shall meet the
following requirements:
(1) A public school student shall not be required to obtain
permission or approval from any official in a the public school district in
*TNL191*
03-18-2025 10:35:32 TNL191

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1482
which he or she is enrolled before being allowed to take the test;
(2) A student enrolled in a private or parochial school shall
provide a letter from the principal or administrator of the private or
parochial school to verify enrollment;
(3) A student enrolled in a home school shall provide a
notarized copy of the notice of intent to home school provided to the
superintendent of the local school district as required by § 6-15-503; and
(4) A student enrolled in a public, private, parochial, or home
school must achieve at least the minimum official GED practice test scores.

/s/Gramlich

























03-18-2025 10:35:32 TNL191